Tennessee statutes. Title 18 Clerks Of Courts
Part 2

Courts of General Sessions

18-4-201. Compensation of clerk of general sessions court.

The clerk of the circuit court, when acting as clerk of the court of general sessions, shall receive the compensation provided by law for circuit court clerks, as fixed by § 8-24-102. The fees, commissions and emoluments of the clerk of the court of general sessions shall constitute part of the fees, commissions and emoluments of the office of the clerk of the circuit court. The clerk shall receive such additional amount for the clerk's services as clerk of the court of general sessions as may be fixed by any private act in effect on March 11, 1959, or thereafter enacted affecting such county.

However, the clerk of any special court serving as a clerk of general sessions court as provided in § 16-15-301 shall receive only the fees, commissions and emoluments as provided by law for the general sessions court, and the compensation received shall be in addition to the compensation that the clerk receives for the clerk's services in the special court or courts. The compensation of the clerk shall not exceed the maximum statutory amount for the circuit court as allowed by law.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 16; 1963, ch. 216, § 1; T.C.A., § 18-408.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Justices of Peace and General Sessions Courts, § 11.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Circuit Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 241.

18-4-202. Financial report of general sessions court filed by clerk.

It is the duty of the clerk of the court of general sessions to make and file with the county clerk of the county for transmission to each regular quarterly session of the county legislative body a complete detailed financial report of all receipts and disbursements of the court of general sessions for the previous quarter.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 16; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A., § 18-409.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

18-4-203. Powers and duties of clerk.

The clerk of the general sessions court has concurrent authority with the judge to issue warrants and other process and writs, other than those that the law requires to be issued only by a judicial officer, and has the authority to set the amount of bond in the absence of the judge.

It is the duty of the clerk of the general sessions court to:

Keep all dockets required by title 16, chapter 15;

Write all minute entries required;

Promptly make any and all entries necessitated by §§ 16-15-101 - 16-15-711, 18-4-201, 18-4-202, 20-12-143, and 27-5-108, and former §§ 40-118, 40-424, and 40-425 (repealed); and

Notify the Tennessee bureau of investigation of final disposition of criminal proceedings against a person as soon as practicable but no later than thirty (30) days after final disposition of the criminal proceedings.

In counties having a population of not less than twenty thousand seven hundred (20,700) nor more than twenty-one thousand seven hundred (21,700), the clerk of the general sessions court has authority to issue search warrants and peace warrants.

Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 17; 1972, ch. 486, § 1; T.C.A., § 18-410; 2016, ch. 739, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Sections 40-118, 40-424 and 40-425, referred to in subsection (b) of this section, are now codified at §§40-1-109,40-4-117 and40-4-118 (repealed), respectively.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote (b), which read, “It is the duty of the clerk of the general sessions court to keep all dockets required by title 16, chapter 15, to write all minute entries required and to promptly make any and all entries necessitated by §§16-15-101 —16-15-711,18-4-201,18-4-202,20-12-143 and27-5-108, and former §§ 40-118, 40-424 and 40-425 (repealed).”

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 739, § 3. April 7, 2016.

Cross-References. Authority of clerks to issue arrest warrants, §40-6-214.

Persons whose compensation is contingent upon issuance or nonissuance are prohibited from issuing a search warrant, an arrest warrant or mittimus, §40-5-106.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 6 Tenn. Juris., Clerks of Court, §§ 11, 12.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — 1961 Tennessee Survey (II) (James C. Kirby, Jr.), 15 Vand. L. Rev. 847.

Pleadings, Motions and Pre-Trial Procedure, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 219.

The Tennessee Court System — General Sessions Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 375.

Attorney General Opinions. Clerks of general sessions and circuit courts do not have authority to issue immediate, pre-trial writs of possession, OAG 01-094 (6/7/01).

Cited: State ex rel. Lewis v. State, 208 Tenn. 534, 347 S.W.2d 47, 1961 Tenn. LEXIS 316 (1961); Dockery v. Dockery, 559 S.W.2d 952, 1977 Tenn. App. LEXIS 309 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1977).